Utah statutes.
19-6-817.   Administrative fees to local health departments -- Reporting by local health departments.

(1) (a)  The Division of Finance shall pay quarterly to the local health departments from the fund $5 per ton of tires for which a partial reimbursement is made under this part.

(b)  The payment under Subsection (1)(a) shall be allocated among the local health departments in accordance with recommendations of the Utah Association of Local Health Officers.

(c)  The recommendation shall be based on the efforts expended and the costs incurred by the local health departments in enforcing this part and rules made under this part.

(2) (a)  Each local health department shall track all waste tires removed from abandoned waste tire piles within its jurisdiction, to determine the amount of waste tires removed and the recycler to which they are transported.

(b)  The local health department shall report this information quarterly to the director.

